Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 42 Ancillary Administration
28-42-110. Payment of debt and delivery of property to domiciliary foreign personal representative.

At any time after the expiration of sixty (60) days from the death of a nonresident decedent, any person indebted to the estate of the nonresident decedent or having possession or control of personal property or of an instrument evidencing a debt, obligation, stock, or chose in action belonging to the estate of the nonresident decedent may pay the debt, deliver the personal property, or deliver the instrument evidencing the debt, obligation, stock, or chose in action to the domiciliary foreign personal representative of the nonresident decedent upon being presented with proof of the representative's appointment and an affidavit made by or on behalf of the representative stating:

Payment or delivery made in good faith on the basis of the proof of authority and affidavit releases the debtor or person having possession of the personal property to the same extent as if payment or delivery had been made to a local personal representative.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 370, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3110.

28-42-111. Jurisdiction over foreign personal representative.

A foreign personal representative submits himself or herself to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state by:

Jurisdiction under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be limited to the money or value of personal property collected.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 370, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-3111.

Chapters 43-47

[Reserved.]